Utah statutes.
53A-8-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Career employee" means an employee of a school district who has obtained
a reasonable expectation of continued employment based upon Section 53A-8-106
and an agreement with the employee or the employee's association, district
practice, or policy.
(2)  "Contract term" or "term of employment" means the period of time during
which an employee is engaged by the school district under a contract of
employment, whether oral or written.
(3)  "Dismissal" or "termination" means:
(a)  termination of the status of employment of an  employee;
(b)  failure to renew or continue the employment contract of a career employee
beyond the then-current school year;
(c)  reduction in salary of an employee not generally applied to all employees
of the same category employed by the school district during the employee's
contract term; or
(d)  change of assignment of an employee with an accompanying reduction in
pay, unless the assignment change and salary reduction are agreed to in
writing.
(4)  "Employee" means a career or provisional employee of a school district,
but does not include:
(a)  the district superintendent, or the equivalent at the Schools for the
Deaf and the Blind;
(b)  the district business administrator or the equivalent at the Schools for
the Deaf and the Blind; or
(c)  a temporary employee.
(5)  "Provisional employee" means an individual, other than a career employee
or a temporary employee, who is employed by a school district.
(6)  "School board" or "board" means a district school board or its equivalent
at the Schools for the Deaf and the Blind.
(7)  "School district" or "district" means:
(a)  a public school district; or
(b)  the Schools for the Deaf and the Blind.
(8)  "Temporary employee" means an individual who is employed on a temporary
basis as defined by policies adopted by the local board of education.  If the
class of employees in question is represented by an employee organization
recognized by the local board, the board shall adopt its policies based upon
an agreement with that organization.  Temporary employees serve at will and
have no expectation of continued employment.
